Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3713
Cooperation;
notice required.

(1) All government agencies,
service providers, professionals, school
districts, school personnel, parents, and families shall cooperate
with all reasonable requests of the court appointed special advocate volunteer.
The volunteer shall cooperate with all government agencies, service providers,
professionals, school districts,
school personnel, parents, and families.

(2) The volunteer shall be notified in a timely manner of
all hearings, meetings, and any other proceeding concerning the case to which
he or she has been appointed. The court in its discretion may proceed notwithstanding
failure to notify the volunteer or failure of the volunteer to appear.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 36;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 30.